Wyoming, session 2025, HB0202.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 16-13-101 is created to read:

CHAPTER 13
DEVELOPMENT OR IMPROVEMENT OF PROPERTY TIMELINES
HB0202

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0529

16-13-101. Permitting timeline for the development or
improvement of property.

(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Delivered by electronic means" includes
delivery to an electronic mail address at which an
applicant has consented to receive notices, documents or
information;

(ii) "Local government entity" means a governing
body of a city, town, county or other political subdivision
of the state including a planning commission or a planning
and zoning commission;

(iii) "Request" means an application, within the
subject property's permitted zoning use, for an approval
from a local government entity for an action relating to
the development or improvement of property including a
building permit, change of permitted zoning use or
variance. "Request" shall not include applications for
HB0202

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0529
conditional use permits, rezoning, subdivision permits,
subdivision plats or temporary zoning uses.

(b) After an applicant submits a request to a local
government entity, the local government entity shall
provide written notice not later than fifteen (15) days
after receipt of the request notifying the applicant if the
applicant's request is complete or incomplete for failing
to contain all information required by law or an adopted
rule, ordinance or policy of the local government entity.
The written notice under this subsection shall explain what
information is necessary for the applicant's request to be
complete and the notice may be delivered by electronic
means.

(c) If the development or improvement that is the
subject of the applicant's request is within the subject
property's permitted zoning use the local government entity
shall not require meetings relating to zoning between the
applicant and the local government entity and the local
government entity shall continue the process for approval
or denial of the request without requiring meetings
relating to zoning.
HB0202

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0529

(d) After an applicant submits a complete request to
the local government entity, the local government entity
shall approve or deny the applicant's request not later
than sixty (60) days after the date the completed request
is submitted unless:

(i) An applicant and the local government entity
agree in writing to an extension of the deadline; or

(ii) An applicant's request requires approval by
a state or federal agency. If the applicant's request
requires approval by a state or federal agency then the
deadline shall be extended for not more than an additional
ten (10) days unless the applicant and the local government
entity agree in writing to an alternative deadline.

(e) If the local government entity denies the
applicant's request, the local government entity shall
provide written notice not later than seven (7) days after
the denial of the applicant's request stating the reasons
why the local government entity denied the applicant's
HB0202

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0529
request. The written notice under this subsection may be
delivered by electronic means.

(f) Any requirements missed by a local government
entity during a plan review of an applicant's request that
is imposed on an applicant after the applicant's request
has been approved shall result in a ten percent (10%)
reduction in the applicant's fees charged for the request,
unless the requirements that are imposed are a result of
unanticipated conditions of the subject property that
require the applicant to implement mitigation measures.

(g) Except as provided in paragraph (d)(i) of this
section, if a local government entity fails to comply with
the deadline established under subsection (d) of this
section, then the applicant's request shall be approved as
submitted. A building constructed pursuant to a permit
approved under this subsection shall pass all safety and
code compliance inspections prior to the issuance of a
certificate of occupancy.

HB0202

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0529
Section 2. This act shall apply to applications
relating to the development or improvement of property
filed on and after July 1, 2025.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0202